Indiana, session 2026, SB104.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13. Landlord's Required Nexus
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to an agreement executed after June
30, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "landlord" has the meaning set
forth in IC 32-31-3-3. The term does not include an individual.
Sec. 3. After June 30, 2026, a landlord may not lease a property
in Indiana unless one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The landlord is authorized to do business in Indiana.
(2) The landlord maintains:
(A) a residence; or
(B) an office at one (1) or more physical locations in
Indiana.
(3) The landlord appoints an Indiana licensed real estate
broker or broker company to manage the rental property.
SB 104—LS 6255/DI 13


(4) The landlord owns five (5) or less properties in Indiana.
Sec. 4. (a) If the attorney general suspects that a landlord is
leasing a property in violation of section 3 of this chapter, the
attorney general shall send the landlord a notice of violation. The
notice must require the landlord to correct the violation and
provide proof of the correction within forty-five (45) days.
(b) If a landlord does not correct a violation described in a
notice sent under subsection (a), the attorney general may bring a
civil action against the landlord for each violation that was not
corrected to seek the following:
(1) An order imposing a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.
(2) Injunctive relief.
(3) Reasonable attorney's fees and enforcement cost of the
investigation and prosecution.
A civil penalty imposed under this section shall be paid to the state
general fund.
SB 104—LS 6255/DI 13


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Rules and Legislative
Procedure, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 104, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Delete the title and insert the following:
A BILL FOR AN ACT to amend the Indiana Code concerning
property.
Delete everything after the enacting clause and insert the following:
(SEE TEXT OF BILL)
and when so amended that said bill be reassigned to the Senate
Committee on Local Government.
(Reference is to SB 104 as introduced.)
BRAY, Chairperson
SB 104—LS 6255/DI 13